Utah statutes.
70A-2a-305.   Sale or sublease of goods by lessee.
(1)  Subject to the provisions of Section 70A-2a-303, a buyer or sublessee
from the lessee of goods under an existing lease contract obtains, to the
extent of the interest transferred, the leasehold interest in the goods that
the lessee had or had power to transfer, and except as provided in Subsection
(2) and Subsection 70A-2a-511 (4), takes subject to the existing lease
contract.  A lessee with a voidable leasehold interest has power to transfer a
good leasehold interest to a good faith buyer for value or a good faith
sublessee for value, but only to the extent set forth in the preceding
sentence.  When goods have been delivered under a transaction of lease, the
lessee has that power even though:
(a)  the lessor was deceived as to the identity of the lessee;
(b)  the delivery was in exchange for a check which is later dishonored; or
(c)  the delivery was procured through fraud punishable as larcenous under the
criminal law.
(2)  A buyer in the ordinary course of business or a sublessee in the ordinary
course of business from a lessee who is a merchant dealing in goods of that
kind to whom the goods were entrusted by the lessor obtains, to the extent of
the interest transferred, all of the lessor's and lessee's rights to the
goods, and takes free of the existing lease contract.
(3)  A buyer or sublessee from the lessee of goods that are subject to an
existing lease contract and are covered by a certificate of title issued under
a statute of this state or of another jurisdiction takes no greater rights
than those provided both by this section and by the certificate of title
statute.
